Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1658.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of April 8, 1982 (P.L.310, No.87), referred to as the Recorder of Deeds Fee Law, is amended to read:AN ACTEstablishing [fees for services of recorders of deeds] modernization of fees for recordation of documents in counties of the second A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth classes and home rule charter counties of these classes; authorizing a special deed and mortgage 12345678910111213141516171819202122 recording fee in certain counties; and establishing county demolition funds.Section 2. Section 1 of the act is repealed:[Section 1. The fees of the recorders of deeds in counties of the second A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth classes shall be as follows:Instrument Feeup to4 names and4 pagesexclusive of notationsAdjudication, certified excerpt................ $11.50Agreement...................................... 11.50Articles of incorporation...................... 11.50Amendments..................................... 11.50Assignments.................................... 11.50Award.......................................... 11.50Branding....................................... 11.50Charter........................................ 11.50Commission - district judge.................... 14.50Commission - notary public and bond............ 14.50Commission - police and oath................... 14.50Condominium:Code of regulations........................ 11.50Declaration of plans....................... 11.50Plan (24 x 36)............................. 25.00Consent form................................... 11.50Correction instrument or re-recording.......... 11.50Decree of court of feme sole trader............ 11.50Deed........................................... 11.50Each additional description................ .5020250HB1658PN2016 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Each additional parcel number.............. .50Declaration of taking or trust................. 11.50Discharge (veteran)............................ FreeDistribution................................... 11.50Easements...................................... 11.50Election to take............................... 11.50Extension of mortgage.......................... 11.50Finance statements............................. 9.50Secured transaction........................ 9.50on standard formAssignment or release...................... 9.50on standard formContinuation............................... 9.50on standard formTermination................................ 9.50on standard formFinance statement-nonstandard-first supplement page.............................................. 2.00Each additional supplement page............ 1.00Leases......................................... 11.50Mortgages...................................... 11.50Each additional description................ .50Each additional parcel number.............. .50Mortgage satisfaction.......................... 5.00Order of court (except to satisfy)............. 11.50Order to satisfy lost mortgage................. 11.5020250HB1658PN2016 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Ordinances..................................... 11.50Power of attorney.............................. 11.50Release........................................ 11.50Re-recording................................... 11.50Revocation..................................... 11.50Right-of-way................................... 11.50Sheriff's deed................................. 11.50Mortgage satisfaction piece.................... 11.50Termination of Federal tax lien................ 9.50Filing fee for Act No. 287 of 1974............. 5.00Copy - each township 2.00Preferential assessments under Act No. 319 of 1974.............................................. 11.50Certification and seal......................... 1.50Each name over four............................ .50Each page or part over four.................... 2.00Each marginal notation......................... 2.00State highway and/or mining plans - first page. 10.00Each additional page....................... 3.00Each name indexed.......................... .50Subdivision plans - fee to be set by recorder of deedsAcknowledgments................................ 2.00Searches:Financial statements each debtor............... 5.00Additional fee for each financing statement found and for each statement of assignment reported therein.................................. 1.00Ownership...................................... 5.00Change of name................................. 5.0020250HB1658PN2016 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Mortgage assignment............................ 5.00Ancillary transaction.......................... 5.00Copies:Per page....................................... .50Certification.................................. 1.50Where no fee is specified the fee shall be set by the recorder of deeds.]Section 3. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1.1. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Document." Any document or instrument, other than a veteran discharge paper, delivered to a recorder of deeds which is required by law or is eligible to be recorded in person, by mail, electronically or in any other manner."Flat rate." A rate that does not vary based on any factor under section 1.2(b)."Statutory fee." Any fee, tax or surcharge required by regulation or act of the General Assembly to be collected upon recordation of a document, including, but not limited to, the surcharges imposed under section 1795.1-E of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.Section 1.2. (a) The fees of the recorders of deeds in counties of the second A, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh and eighth classes, or equivalent officers in home rule charter counties, for the recordation of a document shall be imposed at a flat rate not to exceed $50 for the first 50 pages. An additional fee, at the same rate, may be imposed for every 50 pages thereafter. An additional fee of $1 per name in excess of 25 names may be imposed for a document containing more than 25 20250HB1658PN2016 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 names.(b) No fee, other than a fee established under this section or another statutory fee, shall be charged by a recorder of deeds, an equivalent officer in a home rule charter county or any other county office for the recordation of a document, regardless of the number of times rejected, or otherwise.(c) A county shall be subject to the following:(1) An additional fee established in accordance with 53 Pa.C.S. § 6011(a) (relating to affordable housing programs fee in counties) shall be imposed at a flat rate not to exceed 100% of fees collected under subsection (a).(2) A recorder of deeds may charge 50 ¢ per page for copies and $1.50 for certifications of previously recorded documents.(d) The governing body of each county shall, by resolution or ordinance, establish fees in accordance with subsections (a) and (c)(1) and (2), to the extent that the fees are imposed by the county, within 120 days of the effective date of this section and may, no more frequently than every two years, adjust those fees within the limitations of this section. In the absence of a resolution or ordinance by the governing body of a county, the flat rate fee for the recordation of a document shall be $50 for the first 50 pages.Section 4. Sections 2.1(b) and 2.2(b) of the act are amended to read:Section 2.1. * * *(b) In addition to the fee charged by a recorder of deeds or by an equivalent officer in a home rule charter county, a flat rate fee in the amount of [$5] $10 shall be charged and collected for each document recorded. The fee shall be 20250HB1658PN2016 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distributed in the following manner:(1) The amount of [$3] $6 shall be retained in a separate fund within the office of the recorder of deeds to be used, in accordance with regular county budgeting, contracting and procurement practices, to support development and improvement of office records management activities and systems in the office of the recorder of deeds or in its equivalent in a home rule charter county. Amounts in the separate fund shall not be used to substitute any allocations of general revenues for the operation of the recorder's office without the express consent of the recorder. The separate fund shall be audited by the appropriate auditing agency, and any unexpended balance, together with interest earned on the separate fund, shall be left in the separate fund to accumulate from year to year. Beginning with the close of the fiscal year four years after the effective date of this section and every four years thereafter, any unencumbered funds remaining in the separate fund shall be transferred to the County Records Improvement Fund.(2) The amount of [$2] $4 shall be deposited in the County Records Improvement Fund for use as prescribed in subsection (c).* * *Section 2.2. * * *(b) In addition to the fees charged by a recorder of deeds or an equivalent officer in a county, the governing body of the county may, by resolution or ordinance, authorize the recorder of deeds to charge and collect a flat rate fee not to exceed $15 for each deed and mortgage recorded. The fee shall be deposited into the county demolition fund to be used exclusively for the 20250HB1658PN2016 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 demolition of blighted property situate in the county.* * *Section 5. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.(2) The following acts and parts of acts are repealed:(i) The act of December 17, 1986 (P.L.1685, No.197), relating to recorder of deeds - charges for accepting documents.(ii) 53 Pa.C.S. § 6011(b).Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1658PN2016 - 8 - 123456789101112